Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1065.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *1234567891011121314151617 "Destroyed firearm frame or receiver." A frame or receiver that has been permanently altered not to provide housing or a structure that may hold or integrate any fire control or essential internal component, is not readily convertible and may not readily be assembled, completed or restored to a functional state. Acceptable methods of destruction include completely melting, crushing or shredding the frame or receiver or completely severing at least three critical areas of the frame or receiver using a cutting torch having a tip of sufficient size to displace at least 1/4 inch of material at each location."Federal firearms licensee." A dealer, manufacturer or importer who is licensed by the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives to engage in the business of manufacturing, importing or dealing in firearms."Fire control or essential internal component." A component necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete or continue the firing sequence, including a hammer, bolt, bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, firing pin, striker or slide rails.* * *"Firearm frame or receiver." A part of a firearm that, when assembled, is visible from the exterior and provides housing or a structure designed to hold or integrate one or more fire control components, including pins, a hammer, bolts, a bolt carrier, breechblock, cylinder, trigger mechanism, firing pin, striker, slide rail or other attachments that are required to connect components to the housing or structure necessary for the firearm to initiate, complete or continue a firing sequence."Firearm kit." A collection of most or all of the components, finished or unfinished, necessary to complete a 20250HB1065PN1166 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 functional firearm within a short period of time. The term includes jigs, templates, instructions, drill bits and tools that allow the purchaser to complete the weapon to a functional state with minimal effort, expertise or equipment."Firearm muffler or silencer frame or receiver." A part of the firearm that, when the complete device is assembled, is visible from the exterior and provides housing or a structure, including an outer tube or modular piece designed to hold or integrate one or more essential internal components of the device, including a baffle, baffling material or expansion chamber.* * *"Partially complete, disassembled or inoperable firearm frame or receiver." A frame or receiver that has reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be completed, assembled or restored to a functional state or is readily convertible to a functional state. The term includes a forging, casting, printing, extrusion, machined body or similar article that has reached a stage in manufacture where it is clearly identifiable as an unfinished component part of a weapon.* * *"Privately made firearm." A firearm or firearm frame or receiver, assembled or otherwise produced by a person other than a Federal firearms licensee that does not contain a serial number or other identifying markings placed by a Federal firearms licensee at the time the firearm was produced."Readily convertible." An object that can be so converted without any special skill on the part of the person converting it and the work involved in converting it does not require equipment or tools other than such as are in common use by a 20250HB1065PN1166 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 person carrying out works of construction and maintenance in the person's home.* * *"Split or modular firearm frame or receiver." A firearm with more than one part that provides housing or a structure designed to hold or integrate one or more fire control or essential internal components. The term includes frames or receivers of different weapons that are combined to create a similar weapon with each retaining respective classifications as frames or receivers provided the original design and configuration of the frames or receivers remains unaltered.* * *Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 6110.3. Sale of firearm or firearm parts without serial numbers.(a) Offense defined.--(1) A person who sells or otherwise transfers any of the following, separately or as part of a firearm kit, not imprinted with a serial number registered with a Federal firearms licensee, commits a felony of the third degree: (i) a firearm frame or receiver;(ii) a firearm muffler or silencer frame or receiver;(iii) a split or modular firearm frame or receiver; or(iv) a partially complete, disassembled or inoperable firearm frame or receiver.(2) A person who, with the purpose to manufacture or otherwise assemble a firearm and without being registered or licensed to do so under 18 U.S.C. § 923(a) (relating to 20250HB1065PN1166 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensing), purchases or otherwise obtains separately or as part of a firearm kit any of the following that is not imprinted with a serial number registered with a Federal firearms licensee, commits a felony of the second degree:(i) a firearm frame or receiver;(ii) a firearm muffler or silencer frame or receiver;(iii) a split or modular firearm frame or receiver; or(iv) a partially complete, disassembled or inoperable firearm frame or receiver.(b) Exception.--The sale, purchase or acquisition of a destroyed firearm frame or receiver shall not constitute an offense under this section.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Firearm." A weapon that is designed to or is readily convertible to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any weapon.§ 6110.4. Privately made firearms.(a) Licensee requirements.--A Federal firearms licensee shall:(1) Regarding a privately made firearm that was acquired prior to the effective date of this paragraph and that is still in the possession of the licensee, conduct one of the following within 60 days of the effective date of this paragraph or prior to the date of disposition, whichever is sooner:(i) properly mark the firearm, unless already marked 20250HB1065PN1166 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by another licensee;(ii) arrange to have another licensee properly mark the firearm on their behalf; or(iii) destroy or surrender the firearm to law enforcement.(2) Regarding a privately made firearm that is acquired by a licensee after the effective date of this paragraph, conduct one of the following within seven days following the date of receipt or other acquisition of the firearm, including from a personal collection or before the date of disposition, whichever is sooner:(i) properly mark the firearm, unless already marked by another licensee;(ii) arrange for another Federal firearms licensee to properly mark the firearm; or(iii) destroy or surrender the firearm to law enforcement.(3) Record privately made firearms in the Federal firearms licensee's acquisition and disposition records, whether or not kept overnight and update acquisition entries with information marked on privately made firearms.(b) Prohibition.--Federal firearms licensees who are dealers or gunsmiths may not perform repairs, modify, embellish, refurbish or install parts in or on firearms, firearm frames or receivers or other firearm parts for or on behalf of a licensed importer or licensed manufacturer.(c) Right of refusal.--Federal firearms licensees shall have the right to refuse to accept, purchase, properly mark, perform repairs, modify, embellish, refurbish or install parts in or on any privately made firearms.20250HB1065PN1166 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Applicability.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a Federal firearms licensee who:(1) Purchases or otherwise obtains a firearm frame or firearm receiver, uses the firearm frame or receiver in the assembly of a firearm and places a serial number on the completed firearm as required under subsection (a).(2) Obtains a privately made firearm for the purpose of properly marking the firearm as required under subsection (a).(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Conspicuous." Identification markings that are capable of being easily seen with normal handling of the firearm and unobstructed by other markings when the complete firearm is assembled."Firearm." A weapon that is designed to or is readily convertible to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any weapon."Legible." Identification markings that use exclusively Roman letters and Arabic numerals, or solely Arabic numerals, and may include a hyphen."Properly mark." The legible and conspicuous identification of each frame or receiver of a firearm subject to the identification procedures in 27 CFR 478.92 (relating to identification of firearms and armor piercing ammunition by licensed manufacturers and licensed importers).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1065PN1166 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728